Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8911
Veterinary legend drug, defined.

Veterinary legend drug means a drug which under federal law is required, prior to being distributed, to be labeled with the following statement: "Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian.".

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 11.